Utah statutes.
55-5-3.   Issuance of licenses -- Preference to blind persons -- Duration
and termination of license.
The state licensing agency shall, in issuing each such license for the
operation of a vending stand or other enterprise, give preference to blind
persons who are in need of employment and who have resided for at least one
year in the state of Utah. Each such license shall be issued for an indefinite
period but may be terminated by the licensing agency if it is satisfied that
the stand or enterprise is not being operated in accordance with the rules and
regulations prescribed by such licensing agency.
